Hawaii statutes.
[§304A‑504] Hawaii state
scholars program. (a) There is established the Hawaii state scholars
program to be administered by the University of Hawaii. This program shall be
used to provide financial assistance in the form of scholarships for up to four
years to any qualified student enrolled at any campus of the University of
Hawaii with the possibility of renewal for a fifth year in exceptional
circumstances.

(b) Appropriations for the state scholars
program shall be deposited into the [University of Hawaii scholarship and
assistance special fund] established pursuant to section [304A‑2159].
The number of scholarships awarded and amount of each scholarship shall be
determined by the university subject to the availability of funds.

The University of Hawaii shall offer
scholarships to pay for educational costs, such as tuition, fees, books,
housing, and other educational costs; provided that the scholarship applicant:

(1) Is a bona fide resident of the State, for tuition
purposes, at the time of admission to the university;

(2) Presents evidence of academic excellence by
meeting one or more of the following:

(A) Graduation from a public or private high
school in the State as a valedictorian of the applicant's class;

(B) Has a cumulative high school grade point
average of 4.0 as determined for admission to the university; or

(C) Has achieved a test score on a
standardized college admission test recognized and accepted by the university
for admission consideration, such as SAT or ACT, that places the student among
the top ten percentile of students taking the test nationwide;

(3) Enrolls at a University of Hawaii system campus
within eighteen months of graduating from high school; and

(4) Maintains satisfactory progress toward degree
completion and a cumulative 3.0 grade point average. [L 2006, c 257, §2]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to repealed chapter 304,
but is codified to this chapter pursuant to L 2006, c 75, §18.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next